Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1713
Sheriff; party to judicial proceedings; duties; county clerk shall perform.

Every county clerk shall serve and execute process of every kind, and perform all other duties of the sheriff, when the sheriff shall be a party to the case, or whenever affidavits shall be made and filed as provided in section 23-1714; and in all such cases he shall exercise the same powers and proceed in the same manner as prescribed for the sheriff in the performance of similar duties.

Laws 1881, c. 42, § 1, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 5683;

Laws 1915, c. 101, § 1, p. 244;

C.S.1922, § 5013;

C.S.1929, § 26-1522;

R.S.1943, § 23-1713.

Sheriff is disqualified from serving process in murder case, where affidavit of disqualification was filed, and it became duty of clerk of district court to issue writ for summoning jurors to county clerk. Trobough v. State, 120 Neb. 453, 233 N.W. 452 (1930).

Sheriff is disqualified to select and summon a special panel of jurors to serve in criminal case in which he is a prosecuting witness. Policky v. State, 113 Neb. 858, 205 N.W. 560 (1925).

Processes issued out of county court may be directed to and be served by coroner, when sheriff is party. Barlass v. May, 16 Neb. 647, 21 N.W. 436 (1884).

Coroner may serve writ of replevin whenever sheriff is party to the action. Keith Brothers v. Heffelfinger, 12 Neb. 497, 11 N.W. 749 (1882).